<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89703-0014 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-03-89.f2.A1013</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">FEDERAL HOME LOAN BANK BOARD</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Parts 561, 563</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[No. 89-1632] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 3068-AA73 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Regulatory Capital Requirements for Insured Institutions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Date: June 22, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Home Loan Bank Board.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Advance supplemental notice of proposed rulemaking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (the ``Board'') is todaypublishing for comment a description of proposed methodologies to be usedin calculating the interest-rate-risk component of its recently proposednew regulatory capital requirements. Following receipt and considerationof public comments, the Board intends that this advance supplemental noticeof proposed rulemaking will be followed by a notice of proposed rulemakingregarding amendments to the new risk-based capital regulations that willset forth the complete, detailed formulas and assumptions to be used incalculating the interest-rate-risk component of the capital requirementfor each institution.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments must be received on or before August 2, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Send comments to: Director, Information Services Division,Office of the Secretariat, Federal Home Loan Bank Board, 1700 G Street,NW., Washington, DC 20552. Comments will be available for public inspectionat Information Services, Federal Home Loan Bank Board, 801 17th Street,NW., Washington, DC 20006.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Robert Fishman, Senior PolicyAnalyst, (202) 331-4592; John Robinson, Managing Director, (202) 331-4587;Office of Regulatory Activities, Federal Home Loan Bank System, 801 17thStreet, NW., Washington, DC 20006; Donald Bisenius, Director, FinancialAnalysis Division, (202) 906-6759, Office of Policy and Economic Research;Andrew Gilbert, Attorney, (202) 906-6441; Theresa Stark, Attorney, (202)906-7054; Deborah Dakin, Regulatory Counsel, (202) 906-6445; Regulationsand Legislation Division, Office of General Counsel, Federal Home LoanBank Board, 1700 G Street, NW., Washington, DC 20552.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>On December 23, 1988, the Board proposedto revise its regulations establishing capital requirements for thriftinstitutions. <T3>See </T3>53 FR 51800 (Dec. 23, 1988). The proposed rule would establishrisk-based capital requirements that ensure that institutions maintainthe level of capital necessary for safe and sound operation. The proposalwould set an institution's minimum required level of capital as the sumof three elements, with one component based on each of the following: creditrisk, interest-rate risk, and collateralized borrowings. The Board is proposing to incorporate an interest-rate-risk (``IRR'') componentbased on a methodology that is superior to the method it has used heretoforeto account for interest-rate risk in setting capital requirements. Thenew IRR component would replace the existing maturity-matching credit;this maturity gap technique was itself incorporated into the capital rulesin 1986 as an evolutionary improvement over the original ``qualifying balancededuction'' that the Board had first used in 1980 to account for interest-raterisk. The proposed new IRR component relies on a methodology that wouldmeasure such risk based upon the institution's entire portfolio, ratherthan looking to just a specified list of assets during a particular timeframe. <T3>See </T3>53 FR at 51809-10. The Board is today publishing for comment proposed methodologies to beused in calculating the interest-rate-risk exposure component of the proposedrisk-based capital rule. A presentation of these possible methodologiesis contained in Appendix A to this notice. <ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion </ITAG>Under proposed new andSection; 563.13(c)(1)(ii), an institution's minimumregulatory capital requirement would incorporate a component equal to fiftypercent of its interest-rate-risk exposure, as measured on the basis ofthe estimated potential decline in its market value of portfolio equity(``MVPE''). An institution's MVPE equals the aggregate market value ofall its on- and off-balance sheet financial instruments; <T3>i.e.</T3>, the market value of assets, minus the market value of liabilities,plus the net market value of off-balance sheet items. The market valueof a financial instrument changes as market interest rates change, andthe greater the sensitivity of an instrument's market value to interest-ratechanges, the greater is the interest-rate risk inherent in that instrument.Since, for most financial institutions, the value of the portfolio of financialinstruments accounts for the predominant portion of the institution's totalmarket value, a measurement of the MVPE sensitivity provides an excellentmeasure of the institution's exposure to interest-rate changes.\1\<NOTE/>  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The Board is aware that there may be scenarios in whichthe interplay of the proposed interest-rate-risk calculation and the Board'spolicy statement in ``Investment Portfolio Policy and Accounting Guidelines,''Board Res. No. 89-1480, 54 FR 23457 (June 1, 1989), may cause an institution'sregulatory capital requirement to increase while the value of its assetsfalls. We believe this is appropriate since the proposed interest-rate-riskcalculation changes the capital requirement in response to the risk offuture interest-rate movements and the impact on the institution. The InvestmentPortfolio Policy and Accounting Guidelines address the measurement of theinterest-rate movements on past operations and does not reflect the potentialimpact of future interest-rate movements.In particular, proposed andSection; 563.13(e) defines an institution's IRRexposure as the estimated decline in its MVPE that would result from animmediate and sustained 200 basis-point increase or decrease in interestrates. The proposed rule then prescribes the use of a discounted cash flowanalysis in estimating the risk of decline in the institution's value;<T3>i.e., </T3>the estimated decline in the MVPE will equal the presentvalue of the change in present and future earnings that is projected toresult from a sustained 200 basis-point change (up or down) in interestrates. These estimates will be based on the information reported by eachinstitution regarding the outstanding balances, maturities, and interestrates for assets, liabilities and off-balance sheet items. For the purposeof better monitoring IRR sensitivity, section H of the Thrift FinancialReport, which provides a quarterly snapshot of the institution's portfolio,was recently revised to expand and improve the quality of information trackedand reported by all institutions.\2\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ The revised section H is effective for the quarter beginningApril 1989 (<T3>i.e., </T3>for the June 30, 1989 Thrift Financial Report.) The Boardanticipates that further improvements in the quality of information willbe made as experience is gained with the calculation and monitoring ofIRR exposure. For ease of reference, a copy of the new Section H is attachedas Appendix B to this notice. Interested persons may contact Board staffto obtain copies of the extensive instructions to Section H. The assumptions underlying the present value formulas that would be appliedto these Section H portfolio values in calculating IRR exposure are importantfactors in the proposed new risk-based capital requirements. These assumptionscover such items as amortization schedules, repricing dates, discount rates,and the treatment of options (particularly prepayments on loans, call provisionsfor investments, period and lifetime caps on adjustable rate mortgages,and the effective lives of deposits with no specified maturity).\3\<NOTE/> Fairly broad assumptions will also have to be made aboutthe characteristics of reported off-balance sheet instruments and someinvestment securities (notably, mortgage derivatives).<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ Among other things, the Board's December proposal specificallyrequested comments on whether assumptions should be based on regional ornational data, whether adjustments should be made to reflect prior interest-rateshifts, and the extent to which institutions may or should provide theirown assumptions. <T3>See </T3>53 FR at 51811.In its proposal, the Board stated its intention to publish for public commentthe guidelines containing instructions and possible methodologies (includingnecessary assumptions) to be used in calculating IRR exposure. As partof its general program of addressing interest-rate risk, the Board's staffhas been devoting considerable resources to the evaluation and managementof interest-rate risk, drawing upon the more sophisticated tools that aretoday available to the industry. A significant step in this program wasthe recent publication of Thrift Bulletin 13 (``TB 13'') by the Board'sOffice of Regulatory Activities.\4\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ Thrift Bulletin 13, ``Responsibilities of the Board ofDirectors and Management with Regard to Interest Rate Risk,'' Jan. 26,1989. Although TB 13 has already been widely disseminated, the Board ispublishing it herewith, as Appendix C, in light of this bulletin's importanceand relevance to today's proposal.  TB 13 describes internal policies and practices that supervisory staffwill expect institutions to use in order to comply with existing regulationsrequiring directors and officers to manage interest-rate risk. Among otherthings, this will require estimation of the sensitivity of MVPE to increasesand decreases in interest rates ranging from 100 to 400 basis points. TheBoard's staff is charged with devising, and improving on an ongoing basis,the methodologies and assumptions to be used in these calculations.\5\<NOTE/> The Board contemplates using these same assumptions (appliedspecifically to a hypothetical 200  basis-point interest-rate change) incalculating the IRR component of an institution's regulatory capital requirementunder proposed new andSection; 563.13(e).  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ Although TB 13 strongly encourages all institutions todevelop the capability of performing these sensitivity measures for themselves,(and many eventually will be required to do so), as an initial matter theBoard's staff will calculate estimates of sensitivity measurements usingSection H data and will provide these estimates to thrift institutions.<T3>See </T3>TB  13 at pp. 4-6. The Board is today publishing for comment, as Appendix A to this notice,the alternative methodologies and major assumptions that are under considerationfor the calculation of IRR exposure using the MVPE approach. As discussedabove, the sensitivity of an institution's MVPE will be calculated fromdata reported on section H of the most recent quarterly Thrift FinancialReport. Although no actual market values are contained in section H, theinformation on revised Section H will permit the Board to estimate thesensitivity of MVPE to interest rates. Immediately following is a summarydiscussion of the MVPE methodology being considered for use in the developmentof those estimates, with particular attention to discounted cash flow analysisand the treatment of embedded options in such valuation. Interested persons are urged to review and comment on Appendix A whichcontains a detailed presentation of alternative MVPE methodologies foreach of the groups of line items reported on section H. Moreover, whilegeneral comments are welcome, various specific issues are noted for publiccomment throughout the Appendix A discussion.Following receipt of public comment on this advance supplemental noticeof proposed rulemaking, the Board will publish a notice of proposed rulemakingcontaining the complete exposition of the detailed algorithms and assumptionsthat will be used to calculate the interest-rate-risk component of therisk-based capital requirement. Based upon the administrative record generatedby the entire rulemaking, the methodology will be published in final formas an amendment to the final risk-based capital regulation, either directlyor through incorporation by reference of supervisory directives settingforth the methodology. The Board intends that public notice will be givenin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>as ongoing changes and improvements are madeto the MVPE methodology. <ITAG tagnum="84">Summary Presentation of MVPE Methodology </ITAG>As proposed, new andSection; 563.13(e) would prescribe the use of a presentvalue cash flow analysis in estimating the sensitivity of MVPE to changesin interest rates. The market value of a financial asset can be measuredas the present value of its cash flows. This cashflow analysis will beused to value the institution's assets, liabilities, and off-balance sheetinstruments. The discounted present value of all expected cash inflowsand outflows will be used to determine the aggregate market value of portfolioequity under specified interest-rate scenarios. Different instruments in an institution's portfolio will generate differentcash flow patterns. Before performing the discounting calculations, themodel now being developed will first approximate an institution's individualcash flows based on its Section H data. Assumptions will be made aboutthe cash flow characteristics of each line item on the report under thevarious interest-rate scenarios. For example, mortgages will be assumedto be amortizing loans. Thus, their principal and interest flows will beestimated on the basis of the balances, remaining maturities, interestrates, and_in the case of ARMs_repricing characteristics that are reportedfor that line item in Section H. Some degree of aggregation error is inevitable given the limitations ofthe data collected. In particular, although the reporting form has beenorganized to group together instruments with similar cash flow patterns,a single reporting line might still combine instruments with differingcash flow characteristics and discount rates.\6\<NOTE/> Significant differences in cash flow characteristics amongitems reported in a single line will cause some inaccuracies in the modelingresults. More detailed reporting requirements would diminish potentialinaccuracies in the cash flow estimations and, ultimately, in the model'saggregate MVPE estimations. Some compromise, however, is unavoidable betweenthe goal of maximizing estimation accuracy and minimizing the concomitantreporting burdens to the industry. Adjustments and modifications to thatcompromise, as well as improvements in cash flow assumptions, are anticipatedas experience is gained with the working model. Appendix A discusses indetail, for particular section H line items, the various approaches tothis problem of data aggregation.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ A notable example is the single line called ``InvestmentSecurities_Part I'' which aggregates U.S. government, municipal, and corporatesecurities (including preferred stock). The most problematic example, forpurposes of doing the MVPE valuation, is the aggregation of data for thevarious instruments under the line item for ``CMO and REMIC Tranches.''Moreover, limitations in the reporting detail will also affect the degreeof sophistication in the type of valuation techniques that may be appliedto the different section H line items. Thus, although more sophisticatedtechniques may be available for these items, a simple discounted cash flowvaluation technique may still be used for the following line items: secondmortgages, consumer loans, commercial loans, and investment securities(Part I). The choice of the appropriate discount rate is also highly significantin the development of the model since the present value of a financialinstrument is quite sensitive to the discount rate. The discount rate chosenshould result in a present discounted value that represents the liquidationvalue of the relevant asset or liability as accurately as possible. AppendixA includes a detailed discussion of various alternative methodologies foreach of section H line items.In addition to discount rates and cash flow analysis, the treatment ofoptions in the valuation calculations is also a highly significant factor,since many financial instruments in thrift portfolios contain various embeddedoptions, such as loan prepayments and caps on ARMs. These options heldby thrift customers may reduce the value of these assets to the institution.The Board is considering three main approaches for adjusting the valueof certain assets for these ``embedded'' options: (1) A direct pricingapproach using secondary market prices, (2) a modified cash flow approach,and (3) an option-based simulation approach.The direct pricing method is based upon a pricing curve that is obtainedfrom observable secondary market prices. The statistically-derived pricingcurve describes the relationship between market prices of mortgage-backedsecurities and their coupon rates. The curve is used to generate a pricefor reported mortgage balances based on their reported average coupon.The market value can be derived by multiplying the price by the balanceof that item. Finally, the price function is shifted to reflect a parallelshift in the yield curve due to an interest rate change. For example, ifrates climb 200 basis points, then a 10 percent coupon would be expectedto be priced as an 8 percent coupon was prior to the rate shock.Alternatively, the modified cash flow approach uses a discounting mechanismto arrive at the market value of financial assets with different coupons.Cash flows (including interest, principal amortization, and prepayments)are generated using reported balances, rates, remaining maturities, anda prepayment function that is estimated empirically (either by the Boardor from information available from the research departments of securitiesfirms that track this information). The discount factors are derived bygenerating mortgage cash flows for various coupons and then finding spreadsover the zero-coupon Treasury yield curve that equate the present valueof the cash flows to the observed market prices of mortgage-backed securitieswith those coupons. As the term structure of interest rates is subjectedto parallel shocks, new cash flows are generated based on the prepaymentfunction, and new discount rates are calculated by adding the spread overTreasury to the new yield curve. The new market value estimates are formedby discounting the new cash flows by the new discount rates.The third approach of option-based simulation defines an interest rateprocess that would be used to generate hundreds or thousands of interestrate paths based on an assumed measure of interest rate volatility. Usingthe prepayment function, mortgage cash flows are generated along each ofthese paths and an average price (across all paths) is determined. An option-adjustedspread is calculated by adding a fixed spread to the zero coupon Treasuryyield curve to equate the model price with the observed market price forthe security being analyzed. Alternatively, an option-adjusted price canbe obtained for a new interest rate scenario by shifting the interest rateprocess and calculating the new price using the original option-adjustedspread. Because this technique requires a great deal of computer time,the prices would be determined once each quarter for all relevant combinationsof average coupon, average remaining maturity, and interest rate scenario,and these prices would then be stored in a data file. To determine themarket value of a reported balance for a given interest rate change, theappropriate price would be selected from the data file_based on the interestrate scenario, the reported coupon, and the reported remaining maturity_andthen multiplied by the reported balance.As discussed in Appendix A, the option-adjusted approach is generally favoredfor its ability to analyze more precisely the effects of different interest-ratescenarios on the options embedded in most mortgage instruments. The Boardintends that eventually its staff will implement a computer model thatuses this method for the industry's most significant items of mortgagesand mortgage derivative instruments, as well as certain other items. Acash flow approach, however, likely will be used for other line items wherethe use of this less sophisticated method is sufficiently accurate. TheBoard is considering use of the cash flow method for mortgage instrumentsduring some initial period while the more sophisticated option-adjustedspread model is being refined and tested.<ITAG tagnum="84">Request for Comment</ITAG>The Board requests comments on the methodologies being considered for themeasurement of interest-rate-risk exposure. Various specific issues areraised throughout this notice and Appendix A. Comments on these issuesor any of the aspects regarding calculation of the IRR component shouldbe submitted to the Board within thirty days from publication of this advancednotice of proposed rulemaking.<ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix A_Description of the Proposed Interest Rate Risk Componentof the Risk-Based Capital Requirement </ITAG>Interest rate risk is the risk to income and capital resulting from changesin market rates of interest. Uncertainty with respect to future changesin interest rates translate into uncertain net interest income and marketvalues for the financial instruments contained in thrift portfolios. Themarket value of a financial instrument changes as market interest rateschange because the value of a given stream of cash flows declines as interestrates rise and increases as interest rates fall. Moreover, since many assets and liabilities common to thrift portfolioscontain options that may be exercised by the person on the other side ofthe transaction, the risks of increases and decreases in market value oftenare not symmetrical. To manage the risk to their net worth, thrift institutionsmust understand and take actions to control for possible changes in thelevel and volatility of interest rates. In recognition of the importance of interest rate risk to the viabilityof thrift institutions, the Federal Home Loan Bank Board has announcedchanges_effective for June 30, 1989 financial reports_in reporting interestrate sensitive assets and liabilities using Section H of the Thrift FinancialReport (see Appendix B for a copy of the revised reporting form). Thesedata will enable the Board to improve measurement of interest rate risk.In particular, the revised Section H will facilitate the calculation ofthe interest rate risk component of the proposed risk-based capital requirements.This component is based upon the risk to the market value of an institution'sportfolio given an immediate 200 basis point change in interest rates.Under the Bank Board s proposed risk-based capital rule, each institutionwill be required to maintain incremental capital equal to 50 percent ofthe estimated change in the market value of portfolio equity resultingfrom this change in interest rates. The market value of portfolio equity (``MVPE'' or ``portfolio equity'')is, the aggregate market value of all of an institution's on- and off-balancesheet financial instruments (i.e., the market value of an institution'sassets, minus the market value of its liabilities, plus the net marketvalue of its off-balance sheet items). Interest rate risk is greatest forinstruments that have market values very sensitive to changes in interestrates. Since the value of its portfolio of financial instruments accountsfor the predominant portion of the typical financial institution's totalmarket value, the sensitivity of portfolio equity provides a good measureof the exposure to interest rate changes on the part of insured institutions,and, ultimately, the thrift insurance fund. While the Bank Board is awareof the importance of operational equity (the present value of future netoperating and fee income) and franchise value (the present value of claimsto business not yet booked by the thrift), we are focusing on portfolioequity due to problems with measuring operational equity and franchisevalue. The methodologies that the Board proposes to use to determine the interestrate risk component of the new regulatory capital requirement using theMVPE method are described below. The methodologies will vary somewhat fordifferent instruments, depending both on the characteristics of the instrumentand on the amount of information that will be reported for it. Descriptionsfor the various instruments reported on Section H are grouped to the extentthat similar approaches may be used in computing their market value. At the heart of several approaches under consideration is discounted cashflow analysis. In measuring the present value of an instrument after a200 basis point movement in interest rates, the simplest application ofa discounted cash flow analysis would be to simply add 200 basis pointsto the discount factors applied to each of the expected cash flows. TheBoard is considering two variations (described in additional detail below)on the traditional form of discounted cash flow analysis in order to accountfor changes in the value of ``embedded options'' that result from changesin interest rates: (1) The <T3>options-based</T3> discounted cash flow approach is an attempt to adjustfor the change in the value of options by averaging the present value ofthe expected cash flows over a large number of alternative interest ratepaths. (Each interest rate path is generated based on an assumed levelof interest rate volatility.) (2) The <T3>``modified''</T3> discounted cash flow approach attempts to adjustfor the change in the value of options using a less elaborate scheme. Thepresent value calculated using this approach is equivalent to that derivedby the options-based approach using an interest rate volatility assumptionof zero. Under the various approaches described below, the Board will occasionallydistinguish between options that are ``in-the-money'' and those that are``out-of-the-money.'' An option is ``in-the-money'' when the price of theunderlying instrument exceeds the option's strike price (that is, whenthe option can be profitably exercised). An option is ``out-of-the-money''when the opposite situation occurs.I. First MortgagesMortgages and mortgage-related instruments constitute the major portionof aggregate thrift industry assets (over 60% of total thrift assets).As a result, the revised Section H report will collect enhanced informationfor fixed-rate and adjustable-rate mortgages to facilitate more detailedanalysis.<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Fixed-rate, 1-4 Family Mortgage Loans</ITAG>The revised Section H report categorizes the principal balances of fixed-ratemortgages by remaining term to repricing, with further breakouts for balancesby coupon rates in 100 basis point intervals (see Appendix B). The weightedaverage remaining term of all coupons is also reported for each of therepricing intervals greater than 5 years. The Board is considering fivedifferent approaches for calculating the market value of these instruments:(i) an implied duration approach, (ii) a direct pricing approach usingsecondary market prices, (iii) a modified cash flow approach, (iv) an option-basedapproach, and (v) a survey of price estimates by a panel of firms dealingin mortgage securities.(i) The first approach calculates <T3>implied durations </T3>for representative mortgage instruments of theappropriate coupon and remaining maturity. This is done by regressing changesin the price of a particular mortgage-backed security on changes in interestrates. The coefficient estimate resulting from that regression describesthe observed price elasticity of the security and may be interpreted asthe average duration that is implied by the instrument's historical pricefluctuations. As this approach averages the instrument's convexity acrossall interest rate environments that it has experienced, it may be misleading.(Convexity refers to the rate at which duration changes in response toa change in interest rate. Duration is the present-value weighted timeto maturity. It can be expressed as a percentage measure of the price responsivenessof a security to changes in interest rates.) Alternatively, the regressioncould be performed for all securities within a particular range of market-to-couponspreads.(ii) The <T3>direct pricing </T3>approach uses observable secondary market pricesto determine prices for mortgage balances reported on Section H. The approachutilizes a pricing curve to describe the relationship between the couponrates and market prices of mortgage-backed securities and loans. The curveis derived from actual market prices and actual coupons, using nonlinearestimation techniques. Once such a pricing curve has been created, it maybe used to estimate a price, at current market interest levels, for eachreported mortgage balance on the basis of the reported coupon. Multiplyingthe estimated price by the balance results in the estimated market valueof that item under current interest rates. In order to create a similarestimate under a hypothetical interest rate change, simply move along thecurve to the price corresponding to the coupon change. For example, ifmarket rates climb 200 basis points, then a 10 percent coupon will be pricedapproximately like an 8 percent coupon was prior to the rate shock.The next two approaches require the creation of a prepayment function thatrelates, at a minimum, the difference between the current market rate andthe coupon on the mortgage instrument being modeled to the rate at whichthe instrument is expected to prepay. Such functions will be estimatedempirically for the necessary instruments. One basis for such empiricalevidence could be information supplied by the research departments of securitiesfirms that have compiled large volumes of data on such instruments.(iii) The <T3>modified cash flow </T3>approach uses a discounted present value mechanismto calculate the market value of a mortgage instrument:(1) Cash flows (including interest, principal amortization, and prepaymentassumptions) are estimated based on Section H data, under the current interestrate environment, for actual mortgage-backed securities.(2) For each coupon, a spread over the zero-coupon Treasury yield curveis found that equates the present value of the estimated cash flows tothe observed market price of the security.(3) To form the discount rates under the hypothetical interest rate scenarios,the derived spreads are added to each of the hypothetical yield curves.The same set of discount rates is then used in performing the market valuationfor all institutions.For a particular interest rate scenario (such as a 200 basis point shock),the market values of an institution's mortgages are calculated throughestimation of the cash flows (based on the prepayment function and thebalances, rates, and remaining maturities reported on Section H). Thoseestimated cash flows are then discounted using the discount rates appropriateto the reported coupons and interest rate scenario.(iv) The<T3> option-based</T3> approach to market valuation simulates a large numberof possible interest rate paths, each with the same theoretical probabilityof actually occurring, and calculates the present value of the instrumentbeing analyzed under each of those paths. (While each path is equally probable,the paths tend to cluster around an expected value.) The theoretical priceof the instrument is then computed as its average present value acrossall interest rate paths.The first requirement of the option-based approach is to define an interestrate simulation model that will be used to generate hundreds or thousandsof interest rate paths based on an assumed measure of interest rate volatility.The measure of volatility may be based on historical data or derived fromthe current prices of options. Using the prepayment function (either generatedinternally by the Board or based on estimates provided by securities firms),cash flows for a mortgage-backed security are generated and discountedalong each of these paths. The model's estimate of the security's priceis calculated as the average present value across all paths. The option-adjustedspread over the zero-coupon Treasury yield curve that equates the modelprice with the actual market price may then be calculated. Alternatively,an option-adjusted price can be obtained for the security under a hypotheticalinterest rate shock by shifting the starting point of the interest rateprocess by the amount of the shock and calculating the new price usingthe original option-adjusted spread.Because this technique requires a great deal of computer time, prices wouldbe determined once a quarter for all relevant combinations of average coupon,average remaining maturity, and interest rate scenario, and stored in adata file. To determine the market value of an institution's reported mortgagebalance under a given interest rate scenario, the appropriate price wouldbe selected from the data file (based on the interest rate scenario, thereported coupon, and the reported remaining maturity) and multiplied bythe reported balance.(v) The final approach being considered for valuing fixed-rate mortgagesis to periodically obtain <T3>price estimates </T3>for a specified series of mortgage-backed securitiesfrom a panel of dealers. The option-based pricing approach to valuing mortgagesecurities has been widely adopted by the investment banking industry.Individual firms utilize option-based pricing models as analytical toolsin conducting their own trading activities and are continuing to expendsubstantial resources in further refining and developing those models.These firms routinely estimate the prices of a large number of securitiesunder various interest rate scenarios, and a number of firms have tentativelyindicated a willingness to participate on a panel that would provide thenecessary price estimates each quarter. The mean price estimate provided by the panel for each instrument wouldbe stored in a data file. As in the option-based approach described inapproach (iv) above, to determine the market value of an institution'sreported mortgage balance under a given interest rate scenario, the appropriateprice would be selected from the data file and multiplied by the reportedbalance. The Board is currently leaning towards the adoption of options (iii) or(iv). Option (i), the <T3>implied durations </T3>approach, looks back in time to determine futurevalues. The Board prefers, to the extent it can, to look forward as historicalvalues can only serve as approximations. Option (ii), the <T3>direct pricing </T3>approach, assumes we can aggregate prepayment relationshipsacross coupons without seriously compromising the analysis, which may beproblematic. For example, a pool of newly-issued 10% mortgages will behavedifferently than a pool of older 10% mortgages. The latter will react lesssharply to a dramatic decline in interest rates than the former due tothe aging of the pool and the removal from the pool of those mortgagesmost sensitive to interest rate changes. Option (v), where the Board wouldobtain prices from securities firms, has operational problems, includinga forced reliance on parties outside the Board's control, which could createpotential conflicts of interests. Option (iii), the <T3>modified cash flow </T3>approach, has a number of pitfalls, one ofwhich is the reliance on static spreads to Treasuries as interest rateschange. Due to the complexity of developing the <T3>options pricing </T3>approach, however, the Board may initially adoptthe modified cash flow approach, but gradually move toward the option-basedapproach. <ITAG tagnum="81">B. Adjustable-rate, 1-4 Family Mortgage Loans </ITAG>Section H categorizes adjustable-rate mortgages (ARMs) into two classes:those employing current market indices (such as the constant maturity Treasuryindices) and those using indices that lag current market rates (such asthe cost of funds indices). Principal balances are classified by remainingterm to repricing for each of these broad classes of ARMs (see AppendixB). For each repricing category, information is reported on the weightedaverage portfolio rate, the weighted average lifetime cap, the weightedaverage remaining term to maturity, and balances by rate adjustment frequency.Information on margins, teasers, payment adjustment frequency, periodicrate caps or floors, periodic payment caps and floors, or negative amortizationis not reported. The Board is considering three of the five approaches discussed under thefixed-rate mortgages section for estimating the market value of ARMs: (i)The modified cash flow approach, (ii) the option-based approach, and (iii)the survey approach. (i) Under the <T3>modified cash flow </T3>approach, reported data on the average portfoliorate, the weighted average remaining maturity, remaining months to repricing,and subsequent adjustment frequency would be used, in conjunction withan ARM prepayment function, to estimate cash flows resulting from the reportedprincipal balances. ARMs are assumed to prepay as a multiple of currentcoupon fixed-rate conventional loans. In cases where loans have ``cappedout,'' ARMs are assumed to prepay like discount fixed-rate loans. A number of other assumptions also must be made because of the limiteddata detail available in Section H. It would be assumed that the 1-yearconstant maturity Treasury (CMT) index and the Eleventh District cost offunds (COFI) index are representative of the actual indices for balancesreported, respectively, in the current market and lagging market indexcategories. The current values of these indices, as of the reporting date,is used for repricing purposes. Assumptions are also necessary for grossmargins on CMT and COFI instruments. In addition, periodic interest ratecaps for CMT ARMs and lifetime payment caps for COFI ARMs are assumed.All assumptions would be representative of what is typically observed inthe market. Finally, because of the adjustment lag in the cost of fundsindex, the relationship between the Eleventh District COFI and currentmarket rates would be determined empirically. Prices are determined as follows: (1) Under current interest rates, spreads over the zero-coupon Treasuryyield curve are computed that equate the present value of the estimatedcash flows to the observed market price of the relevant type of ARM (either1-year CMT or COFI). Since the spread differs depending on the proximityof the current coupon to the lifetime cap, this process is necessary forlifetime caps that are ``out-of-the-money'' by different amounts. (2) To form the discount rates under the hypothetical interest rate shocks,these spreads are added to each of the hypothetical yield curves. (3) Under the hypothetical interest rate scenarios, prices are determinedby discounting the cash flows. (4) Each price is then further adjusted for the existence of the lifetimecap by deducting an explicit estimate of the market value of that ``embeddedoption.'' The value of the option increases as the hypothetical mortgagerate approaches or exceeds the lifetime cap (strike rate). That value willbe calculated by reference to the prices of actual interest rate caps outof the money by a comparable amount and deducted from the value of theARM. The calculated prices are then stored in a data file and ``lookedup'' by the model based upon the characteristics reported on an institution'sSection H. (ii) The <T3>option-based </T3>approach, applied to ARMs, is similar to the fixed-ratemortgage application. A large number of possible interest rate paths aresimulated, each with the same theoretical probability of occurrence, andthe present value of the instrument is calculated under each path. (Whileeach path is equally probable, the paths tend to cluster around an expectedvalue.) The theoretical price of the instrument is then computed as theaverage present value across all interest rate paths. As with fixed-ratemortgages, the option-based analysis requires the definition of possibleinterest rate paths and an assumed measure of interest rate volatility.(Volatility as used here refers to the standard deviation of changes ininterest rates over a stated period of time, often one year.) It also requiresan ARM prepayment function. Cash flows for an ARM pool (or security) of known price are generated alongeach of these paths and the model's estimate of the pool's (or security's)price is calculated as the average present value across all paths. Theoption-adjusted spread over the zero-coupon Treasury yield curve that equatesthe model price with the actual market price may then be calculated. Alternatively, an estimate of the option-adjusted price can be obtainedfor the pool (or security) under a hypothetical interest rate shock byshifting the starting point of the interest rate process and calculatingthe new price using the original option-adjusted spread. As proposed underthe option-based approach for fixed-rate mortgages, prices would be determinedonce a quarter for all relevant combinations of ARM-type, interest ratescenario, average remaining maturity, and proximity to lifetime cap, andstored in a data file. Under a given interest, rate scenario, the marketvalue of an institution's ARMs would be determined by selecting the appropriateprice from the data file and multiplying the reported balance by that price.(iii) A <T3>survey</T3> of dealers is the third approach under consideration forvaluing ARMs. This approach is identical to that discussed in the contextof fixed-rate mortgages. A panel of firms would provide the necessary estimateseach quarter. The mean price estimate provided by the panel for each instrumentunder each hypothetical interest rate scenario would be stored in a datafile. As in the option-based approach described above, to determine themarket value of an institution's reported mortgage balance under a giveninterest rate scenario, the appropriate price is selected from the datafile and multiplied by the reported balance. As under our discussion of fixed-rate mortgages, the option of relyingon outside firms has operational problems that the Board would prefer toavoid. Option (i), the modified cash flow approach, has a number of pitfalls,one of which is the reliance on static spreads to Treasuries as interestrates change. Because ARMs contain more options than fixed rate mortgages(such as annual and lifetime caps), this concern is magnified. Due to thecomplexity of developing the options pricing approach, however, the Boardmay initially adopt the modified cash flow approach, but gradually movetoward the option-based approach. <ITAG tagnum="81">C. Other Residential and All Nonresidential Mortgage Loans </ITAG>The revised Section H subdivides these loans into adjustable-rate and fixed-ratecategories. Within each category, balances are reported by repricing period.Information is also reported regarding the average interest rate for thebalance in each repricing period. These assets represent about 15% of totalthrift assets. Conceptually, market values for these types of loans could be calculatedin the same manner as the analogous 1-4 family mortgages. A major limitation,however, is that considerably less information is available on SectionH for these assets, since there is much less volume in these types of loans.In addition, there does not exist a broad or deep secondary market forthese assets (unlike residential mortgages), which further limits the Board'soptions. The Board proposes to use a discounted cash flow analysis to assessthese assets. Although the use of this method may misstate the interestrate risk of these instruments, the Board believes that it will not seriouslydistort the interest rate risk for most institutions. To determine the appropriate discount rate, the Board proposes to undertakea periodic survey of financial institutions involved in the limited secondarymarket for these assets. The survey would gather information on currentmarket rates, which would be used to set the discount rate. II. Mortgage Loans Servicing To determine the market value of mortgage loans servicing (both purchasedand excess), the Bank Board is proposing to rely on the same methodologyadopted for First Mortgages. Given the importance of prepayment rate assumptionsin determining the market value sensitivity of mortgage servicing rights,the Board will adopt either the modified cash flow approach or the option-basedapproach. These two approaches require the creation of a prepayment function thatrelates the difference between the current market rate and the coupon onthe mortgage instrument being modeled to the rate at which the instrumentis expected to prepay. Such functions will be estimated empirically forthe necessary instruments. One basis for such empirical evidence couldbe information supplied by the research departments of several securitiesfirms. III. Second Mortgages and Consumer Loans A greater share of both second mortgage and consumer loans have recentlybeen characterized by adjustable, instead of fixed, rates. Also, more ofthese loans have become open-ended as lines of credit related to creditcards and home equity loans have become more readily available to consumers.Typically, the interest rates on second mortgages can be reset at leastannually, and, for consumer loans, they may be reset as frequently as quarterly.Based on the staff's understanding of these assets, the Board proposesto treat most of these as adjustable rate instruments. The bulk of secondmortgages are likely to be reported in the first three repricing categoriesof the revised Section H (i.e., those repricing in 1 year or less). Thesesecond mortgages will be regarded as home equity loans and be treated analogousto adjustable-rate first mortgages. The Board also proposes that the loansappearing in the remaining five repricing categories be treated like single-familyfixed-rate mortgages. Consumer loans will be treated as adjustable-rateloans adjusting every quarter, priced off of the prime interest rate. Calculation of the periodic cash flows and interest income from secondmortgages will utilize algorithms used for evaluating fixed-rate and adjustable-ratefirst mortgage loans. Prepayments, of course, are an important considerationin calculating these cash flows and a reasonable prepayment methodologywill be developed. It is important to note that home equity, credit card,and other personal line-of-credit lending entail default risks that willaffect their market values. The consideration of such credit risk issues,however, is dealt with in the credit risk component of the proposed rule.An alternative approach would value second mortgages and consumer loansusing a discounted cash flow analysis. While such an approach may be lessaccurate than the modified cash flow or options-based approaches, it doeshave the value of being operationally simple. The Board requests commenton the relative merit of adopting this alternative approach. The choice of the appropriate discount rate to use for valuing these assetsis more difficult because these assets do not trade in broad and deep marketslike mortgage-backed securities. The Board proposes to rely on observablemarket rates for establishing the appropriate discount rate. The Boardwould periodically undertake a survey of market participants to collectinformation on current rates for second mortgages. The Board would usepublished prime interest rates for consumer loans since these loans aregenerally based on a spread over the prime rate. IV. Commercial Loans Typically, commercial loans are linked to an index (such as the prime rate)and are non-amortizing. Although commercial loans have grown more prominenton some thrift balance sheets, these assets continue to represent a verysmall proportion of total thrift assets. As of December 1988, they onlyrepresent approximately two percent of total assets for all thrift institutions.The Board proposes that commercial loans appearing in the first three repricingintervals on Section H be treated as non-amortizing adjustable-rate open-endcredits with balloon payment of principal occurring in the fourth repricinginterval. Thus, the cash flows associated with these volumes would consistof the periodic accrual of interest at the weighted average rates reportedon section H as well as the final balloon payment. For the remaining fiverepricing intervals on section H, the Board proposes that commercial loansbe treated as non-amortizing adjustable-rate open-end credits with balloonpayments of principal taking place in the repricing intervals in whichthey are originally reported. As an alternative to treatment as adjustable-rate open-end credit, commercialloans could be valued using a discounted cash flow analysis. The Bank Boardrequests comment as to whether this simpler approach to commercial loanswould be sufficiently accurate.The choice of the appropriate discount rate to use for valuing these assetsis difficult due to a lack of market information. The Board proposes torely on observable market rates for establishing the appropriate discountrate. The Board would periodically undertake a survey of market participantsto collect information on current rates. V. Investment Securities (Part 1) Investment securities reported in Part 1 reflect the more common investmentsecurities, such as U.S. Treasury securities, municipal bonds, corporatedebt, and preferred stock. It is likely that a discounted cash flow approachwill be utilized for this line item. The balances reported will be assumedto be non-amortizing, non-callable bonds. While this treatment does notcharacterize the interest rate sensitivity of callable securities precisely,it provides a reasonable approximation given the manner in which callablesecurities are reported on section H. Institutions will report callablebonds as maturing on the call date if the call option is currently in-the-money,and as maturing on the contractual maturity date if the call option iscurrently out-of-the-money. The discount rate for this analysis would be drawn either from the appropriatepoint on the Treasury yield curve (where the maturity of the Treasury securityequals the duration of the asset) or from a blend of Treasury, municipal,and corporate securities. It should be noted, however, that a ``blended''rate may not differ significantly from the Treasury rate, as municipalsare likely to have slightly lower interest rates than Treasuries (due totheir tax status) and AAA corporate bonds slightly higher rates than Treasuries.VI. Impact of Hedging Activities and Off-Balance Sheet Activities  The data collected on section H concerning hedging activities and off-balancesheet activities is necessarily limited, due to the wide variety of instruments.To the extent that information is not obtained, the Board will assume thatthe characteristics of the instruments involved fall within the normallyexpected range for such instruments. The Board proposes to distinguish hedging activity from other off-balancesheet activity based upon whether the activity is related to an asset orliability on the balance sheet and whether the activity qualifies for hedgingtreatment under GAAP. If both conditions are met, the activity would bereported on the impact of hedging activity lines. Otherwise, the activitywould be reported on the impact of off-balance sheet lines. For most institutions, which are negatively exposed to rising interestrates, the following is a list of the most common types of financial instrumentscovered by the impact of <T3>hedging activities: </T3>long put options on Eurodollar futures, longput options on Treasury bill futures, long put options on Treasury notefutures, and long put options on Treasury bond futures; long positionsin interest rate caps; short positions in futures on Eurodollars, Treasurybills, Treasury notes, and Treasury bonds; and long positions in interestrate swaps (pay fixed and receive floating). For most institutions, which are negatively exposed to rising interestrates, the following is a list of the most common financial instrumentscovered by the impact of <T3>off-balance sheet activities: </T3>optional commitments to originate,purchase, or sell assets; firm commitments to originate, purchase, or sellassets; short positions in options on futures; short positions in interestrate caps; long positions in futures; and short positions in interest rateswaps (receive a fixed rate and pay a floating rate). For <T3>long Treasury futures, </T3>we will obtain information on the SectionH form on the underlying futures instrument. To help clarify what is reportedon the futures line, the Bank Board requires institutions to place specificfutures instruments (and options on futures as mentioned below) on certaindata points. In particular, futures on <T3>Treasury bills </T3>and <T3>Eurodollars </T3>will be reported in the ``More Than Three Months ThroughSix Months'' maturity/repricing column; <T3>Treasury note </T3>futures will be reported in the ``More Than FiveYears Through Ten Years'' column; and <T3>Treasury bond </T3>futures will be reported in the ``More Than TwentyYears'' column. This reporting format enables the Bank Board to more clearlyunderstand the economic characteristics of the underlying futures instruments,and it will contribute to a more accurate measurement of interest raterisk. Once the type of futures instrument and the bond equivalent yield on thefutures instrument at inception is known (from data reported on the SectionH report), a market value can be estimated. The valuation of these futuresinstruments can be estimated by a bond value approach. The market pricein the base case can be estimated using the reported bond equivalent yield.For an interest rate shock, the change in value can be derived by discountinga hypothetical security (such as an 8% coupon, twenty-year bond) by theindicated yield plus the shock. The difference would be taken as the changeof value in these asset categories due to a change in rates. For <T3>long put options on Treasury futures, </T3>we will obtain informationon the Section H report on the underlying futures instrument. For example,an institution would report the dollar amount of an option on a Treasurybond future on a certain data point on Section H as well as the bond equivalentyield on the underlying Treasury bond futures contract at the contractedstrike price. We would then make an assumption regarding the specific expirationmonth of the contract under analysis, use the bond equivalent yield, andinfer the strike price. Once the current market value is estimated, wewould subject the instrument to the interest rate shock and measure themarket value sensitivity. For <T3>long positions in interest rate caps, </T3>we will obtain informationon the Section H report on the maturity of the cap, an adjusted notionalamount of the cap, and the rate at which the cap becomes ``in-the-money''.We will use the weighted average rate of the cap and the maturity to ``backinto'' the original notional amount of the cap, then subject the cap tothe interest rate shock and measure the market value sensitivity. To estimate the market value sensitivity for <T3>options, </T3>we are considering using the Black-Scholes option pricingmodel, thus deriving the underlying price in the shocked environments.This option pricing model requires an estimate of volatility, which couldbe the current implied market volatility for Treasury bond futures options.In the shocked environment, either the same volatility could be used ora formula for systematically changing the volatility, depending on therelative level of underlying prices, could be developed. <T3>Swaps, </T3>both regular swaps (those that receive variable and payfixed) and reverse swaps (those that receive fixed and pay variable), couldbe modeled as non-amortizing swaps where the thrift receives either thefixed or floating portion (depending on the placement in Section H). Thecurrent floating rate and the fixed rate are reported, as is the notionalprincipal on which the swap is based, though there is some unavoidableambiguity when multiple swaps are reported. Once the reported entries havebeen interpreted as a set of swaps, a valuation methodology would estimatethe value of the swaps by discounting the fixed rate portion (which canbe modeled as an annuity) by the floating rate on the swap plus a spread,the spread being derived from current market conditions so that newly originatedswaps have a net value of zero. In shocked rate environments, the floatingrate would be changed by the shocked value, while the spread could be assumedunchanged. This will result in a new discount factor to apply to the fixedrate components and hence a change in the estimated value of the swaps.For <T3>optional commitments to originate, purchase, or sell assets,</T3> theinstitution will estimate the percentage that will actually be originated,purchased or sold and report that amount. For <T3>firm commitments</T3> the institution does not have to make an adjustmentfor any ``fall-out'' experience and therefore reports only the dollar amountof the commitment. In addition, the institution will report the weightedaverage interest rate of the optional and firm commitments. If the commitmentsare in the ``More Than Ten Years Through Twenty Years'' maturity/repricingcolumn or the ``More Than Twenty Years'' maturity/repricing column, wewill treat them in a manner that is economically equivalent to fixed ratemortgages. If the commitments are in the shorter maturity/repricing columns,we will treat them in a manner that is economically consistent with adjustablerate mortgages. We propose to treat liability hedges for the most part like asset hedges,with modifications where necessary. For instance, the options line reportedas liability hedges will contain both long put options and interest ratecaps. The ``More Than Three Months Through Six Months'', ``More Than FiveYears Through Ten Years'' and ``More Than Twenty Years'' maturity/repricingcolumns have been designated for options on futures. The other maturity/repricingcolumns could be assumed to contain (purchased) cap information. Caps couldbe valued by first estimating the notional principal amount (similar tothat done with options) and then referring to a current table of marketprices for caps as a function of maturity and the difference between thecontractual rate and the current rate. In shocked environments, the sameapproach could be used where the current rate would be increased by theshock amount. The impact of off-balance-sheet activities (liabilities) is problematicsince it can contain a variety of complicated instruments of differinginterest rate characteristics. We will, however, assume that all itemson this line are short positions in interest rate caps. Therefore, we willtreat them in a manner that is consistent with the long interest rate capsreferenced above. While for most institutions these items represent a smallportion of their market value, some institutions' market values may besignificantly affected by these activities. Such institutions will haveto be carefully supervised. VII. Equity Securities Equity securities represent claims of ownership ranging from shares inmoney market mutual funds, to shares in stock or bond funds, to outrightstakes in enterprises or projects. The problem with measuring the interestrate risk of such assets is that empirical evidence about the responseof equity securities to changes in interest rate risk is not conclusive.Proxies can be used in lieu of exact measurements. For example, to theextent that equities are <T3>pro rata</T3> shares in identifiable types of pooled debt market instruments(for example, a money market or bond mutual fund), their interest raterisk characteristics may be analyzed as being identical to the net assetvalues of the securities held by the fund. Common and preferred stock funds,however, may have a wide variety of investment objectives with resultingambiguous interest rate risk characteristics. The Board is considering several options for measuring the interest raterisk of equity securities. One would be to ignore this line item in determiningan institution's interest rate risk and apply the ``average'' risk allother assets and liabilities impose on an institution's market value (inessence, the weighted-average duration) to the value of equity securities.A second approach would be to make some general assumptions and apply themto equities. For example, we could look at the actual sensitivity of equitysecurities' values to changes in interest rates over the past five years,and assume that this historical sensitivity will continue. One method todo this would be to determine the effective duration of equities by comparingthe change in value of the Sandamp;P 500 Index over the past five years tothe change in interest rates over that period. A third option would be to exclude equity securities in calculating interestrate risk. This approach assumes that duration equals 0, which is not aneutral assumption. (For example, assuming an institution could determinethe correlation between an equity security and interest rate risk, if theBoard ignored equity securities in determining interest rate risk, thethrift could increase its interest rate risk without increasing its capitalrequirement.) At this time, the Board is undecided about which option to pursue, thoughthe third option is unlikely to be adopted. The Board requests commentson these options. VIII. Debt Securities Rated Below Investment Grade Debt securities rated below investment grade (below the top 4 ratings)may include original issue below investment grade bonds, ``fallen angels'',or non-rated securities. Using yields from long- and intermediate-termhigh-yield indexes and comparable maturity Treasury securities, the spreadsbetween below-investment grade bonds and Treasuries have averaged between4.45 percent and 4.34 percent, respectively, over the 1985 through 1988period. These spreads are significantly variable with a standard deviationof andplusmin;50 to 60 basis points using monthly data. The variability ofthe spreads, even using a diversified yield index, is indicative of factorsunique to the non-investment-grade market, such as special events and issuancevolume. The yield on below investment-grade securities will rise and fall withyields on U.S. Treasury bonds, generally with spread compression as interestrates increase. While changes in interest rates are only a partial explanationof changes in below investment-grade bond yields and market value, theBoard will only focus on these changes since other factors (<T3>i.e ,</T3> financial health of issuer, general health of the economy,etc.) are beyond the scope of the interest rate risk component of the risk-basedcapital rule. Below investment-grade bonds share some of the performance characteristicsof corporate bonds, and some of the attributes of corporate equities. TheBoard proposes to rely on a straight discounted cash flow analysis, treatingthem as investment securities. While the Board believes that this is themost appropriate treatment of these assets, we recognize that many of theseassets have call provisions that will not be taken into account and thatmay alter their market values under certain interest rate scenarios.Research has generally demonstrated that these securities have a shorterduration than Treasuries. Given their high yield, more cash flow is receivedat earlier dates; this, in effect, ``front loads'' the cash flow. Thisalso suggests that these instruments may be less interest rate sensitivethan many other types of instruments. The Board requests comments on this,research and its implications for determining an institution's interestrate risk. If the Board were to treat these assets as investment securities, the discountrate would be drawn either from the appropriate point on the Treasury yieldcurve or from a blend of Treasury, municipal and corporate securities.As noted earlier, a ``blended'' rate may not differ significantly fromthe Treasury rate, as municipals are likely to have slightly lower interestrates than Treasuries (due to their tax status) and AAA corporate bondsslightly higher rates than Treasuries. The Board is also considering relying on observable market rates for establishingthe appropriate discount rate. The Board could periodically undertake asurvey of market participants to collect information on current rates oruse observable rates of return on below investment grade bond funds (plussome adjustment factor). IX. Zero Coupon Securities  Like investment securities, these deep discount securities may be analyzedusing a discounted cash flow analysis. This line item also contains dataon Z-tranche collateralized mortgage obligations (CMOs). To aid in ouranalysis of the Z-tranches, the instructions to Section H direct institutionsto report them in the ``More Than 10 years Through 20 years'' maturity/repricingcolumn. As described in the following discussion of CMOs, the Board proposesto use a ``representative'' approach in valuing such securities. X. CMO AND REMIC Tranches/Residuals The Board recognizes that the valuations of CMO and Real Estate MortgageInvestment Conduit (REMIC) tranches and residuals will present the greatestdifficulties given the limitations in the reporting data. In particular,some aggregation error will be inevitable given the wide variety of suchinvestments and the desire to avoid undue reporting burdens. To amelioratethis difficulty, however, the Section H instructions direct that data onCMO and REMIC tranches and residuals be segregated by type, rather thanby maturity/repricing schedule. For example, rather than report all CMOand REMIC tranches with remaining maturities of 3 months or less in thefirst column of Section H, institutions will report all floating rate tranches,regardless of maturity/repricing, in that column. Similarly, the next columnswill gather information on all super-floating rate tranches, all inverse-floatingrate tranches, etc. Thus, data will be reported on similar types of instrumentsin each column. The Bank Board intends to select a representative CMO or REMIC trancheor residual that would be used to approximate the interest rate sensitivityof all such tranches or residuals reported. The dollar amount reportedin each column would then be assumed to have the characteristics of theserepresentative tranches and residuals for purposes of calculating marketvalue and the impact of changing interest rates on these market values.Staff is currently reviewing several methods of developing representativetranches and residuals. One method would be to create a ``weighted-average''of existing tranches or residuals. Another method would be to base therepresentative tranche or residual on the most common type of CMO or REMICstructure found in institutions portfolios. A third method would be touse as a model the most current structure being sold as of the reportingdate. A fourth model, the most conservative, would be to assume that allthrifts hold structures that are most susceptible to interest rate risk.Another, longer-term method the Bank Board is investigating is the expansionof reporting requirements to enable us to more accurately assess the interestrate risk of CMO and REMIC tranches and residuals. For example, some havesuggested that we evaluate the utility of developing an industry-wide reportingstandard on mortgage derivative products. If such a standard were developed,we could request from institutions information in a set format that wouldmore accurately detail their investments in CMO and REMIC structures. XI. Principal-Only Strips/Interest-Only Strips To determine the market value of principal-only and interest-only strips,the Bank Board is proposing to rely on the same methodology adopted forFirst Mortgages. Given the importance of prepayment assumptions in determiningthe market value sensitivity of these instruments, either the modifiedcash flow approach or the option-based approach will be adopted (see abovefor details on these approaches.) These two approaches require the creation of a prepayment function thatrelates the difference between the current market rate and the coupon onthe mortgage instrument being modeled to the rate at which the instrumentis expected to prepay. Such functions will be estimated empirically forthe necessary instruments. One basis for such empirical evidence couldbe information supplied by the research departments of several securitiesfirms that collect such data. XII. Deposits  <ITAG tagnum="81">A. Interest-Bearing Deposits/Non-Interest-Bearing Deposits </ITAG>Interest-bearing deposits, including NOW, Super NOW and other transactionaccounts, money market deposit accounts, and passbook accounts, and non-interest-bearingdeposits can be considered a thrift's core deposits. An alternative definitionof core deposits is all account balances of less than $80,000; accountswith balances greater than $80,000 would be assumed to be non-core deposits.The Board requests comment on such a division or similar divisions thatrely on dollar thresholds for segregating core from non-core deposits.Because of their indefinite maturity, it is customary to regard some largepercentage of core deposits as more or less permanent sources of funding.On the one hand, some analysts have argued that the indefinite maturityof core deposits makes them essentially due on demand and that, therefore,their market value is identical to their book value, and, furthermore,that their book and market values are invariant as market interest ratesfluctuate. Viewed from this perspective, core deposits would detract from,rather than add to, the net market value of a thrift. At the other extreme, other analysts have suggested that the permanenceof these core deposits makes them essentially perpetuities and that, therefore,their market value can be computed like the market value of a perpetualbond. Treating core deposits as such has two important implications forthe net market value of a thrift. First, when the discount rate used todetermine the present value of the future interest payments on the coredeposits exceeds the nominal rate on the deposits, the resulting marketvalues will be smaller than the book values and, other things being equal,tend to increase the net market value of a thrift. Second, this valuationapproach will result in significantly longer durations for core deposits,implying large price/value sensitivities.Consequently, when evaluating the effects of an instantaneous and sustainedchange in market interest rates, if rates on the core deposits remain stable,the discounting process will further diminish the present, or market, valueof these core deposit liabilities (<T3>i.e.</T3>, reduce the market value of what the institution owes tosomeone else) and increase the net market value of a thrift. such price/valuebehavior for core deposits is consistent with internal transfer pricingsystems used by some depository institutions, which impute a high valueto retail deposit gathering in periods of high market interest rates. Exactly how much the net market value of a thrift is enhanced by core depositsdepends on how the interest costs of those deposits change when marketinterest rates change. In a rising rate scenario, the biggest benefit tonet market value would be gained if the rates paid on the core depositsremained fixed. But, while core deposits may be more or less permanentsources of funding, it is doubtful that they are completely interest rateinelastic. When market interest rates rise far enough, unless the rateon core deposits is adjusted upward, a thrift risks either the loss ofthese deposits through external disintermediation or the forced repricingof these deposits through internal migration to higher yielding depositinstruments. The central question in determining by how much a thrift has to adjustinterest rates on core deposits in order to stabilize their volume in theface of rising market interest rates is to determine a ``decay'' or run-offrate for deposits. Decay rates will vary by type of deposit. The Boardwill distinguish, at the very least, between passbook accounts, escrowaccounts, and transaction accounts. Decay rates will increase as interestrates increase. One crucial component that the Bank Board will need todetermine are the early withdrawal functions. One approach the Bank Board is reviewing involves determining a ``betafactor''_a slope coefficient in a regression of core deposit rates on aselected market interest rate. This approach can be implemented by usingmonthly data on deposit rates found in Section F of the Thrift FinancialReport. It should be noted, however, that the data are available on a monthlyfrequency only since January 1987, a period, until recently, of mostlydeclining or stable rates. How thrifts will adjust their rates on coredeposits in a rising rate environment is difficult to predict. Differentbeta factors could be applied to different types of liabilities. To determine the appropriate discount rate, the Board proposes to establisha wholesale Certificates of Deposit (CD)-based yield curve (or one basedon a similar liability). This CD yield curve would be the basis for establishingthe discount rate to use for fixed maturity deposits, transaction accounts(NOW, Super NOW, etc.), Money Market Deposit Accounts, and passbook accounts.For non-interest bearing accounts, the Board could also rely on the CDyield curve, since it could be viewed as the alternative rate these fundscould be earning. The creation of such a yield curve will not be easy,as CD yields may not be parallel to Treasury yields and spreads may varysignificantly across regions (and across various rates). As an alternative,the Board could establish an arbitrary small discount rate (l-3%). An alternative to a CD-based yield curve would be to rely on the Treasuryyield curve. Under this option, the Board would determine a weighted-averagematurity (after selection of decay rates), and refer to the Treasury yieldcurve to select a point on the curve as the discount rate. This would producea discount rate that can be expressed as the Treasury rate plus (or minus)a given spread. The Board invites comment on how such a spread should becalculated. <ITAG tagnum="81">B. Borrowings </ITAG>In contrast to the permanence of core deposits and fixed maturity deposits,certain liabilities, such as brokered certificates of deposit, FederalHome Loan Bank (FHLB) advances, bank borrowings, reverse repurchase agreements,commercial paper and mortgage-backed bonds, can be regarded as discretionaryfunding sources. To attract and retain these liabilities, thrifts mustpay competitive market rates. Also, in contrast to the indefinite maturityof core deposits, these liabilities have definite contractual maturities,usually quite short-term (typically 180 days or less) except for FHLB advances,term borrowings from commercial banks, subordinated debt, and mortgage-backedbonds. In determining the market value of these liabilities, a dichotomy betweenshort-term and long-term sources arises. If the premise that a thrift mustpay competitive market rates in order to attract these liabilities is accepted,then a thrift would be forced to match increases in market interest ratesto retain them. Consequently, for short-term borrowings (such as thosewith a maturity of one year or less) any fluctuations in the market valuesof short-term liabilities should persist for only short periods of time.As soon as they mature, the rate will, presumably, be reset to the prevailingmarket rate, thus bringing the market value and book value of short-termborrowings back into parity. Hence, for short-term liabilities_brokeredand large denomination CDs, reverse repurchase agreements, and commercialpaper_book values should closely approximate market values. For long-term liabilities, market values and book values can diverge, particularlyif the liabilities are fixed-rate. In that case, the behavior of the marketvalue of long-term, fixed-rate borrowings will mimic the behavior of themarket value of core deposits. Just as in the case of core deposits, athrift with long-term, fixed-rate borrowings will enjoy a windfall in itsnet market value when overall market interest rates rise. The periodicinterest payments and the repayment of the principal which are contractuallyfixed will shrink in present value terms when rates rise, tending to enhancethe thrift's net worth. The difficulty in putting this conceptually simpleapproach into practice is choosing the appropriate discount rates in boththe base case and the shocked interest rate environment. The Board proposes to use a discounted cash flow analysis of these items,and to rely on a FHLB advance-rate based yield curve for determining thediscount rate for these liabilities. The advance-rate based yield curvewould be used for FHLB advances. For ``Other Borrowings'', we will assumethe first 3 categories on Section H are reverse repurchase agreements andwe will rely on LIBOR for the discount rate. (Typically, reverse reposare priced using LIBOR.) For the data reported in the other columns onthe ``Other Borrowings'' line, we will rely on the advance-rate yield curvefor determining the appropriate discount rate. These columns include awide variety of longer term borrowings, such as mortgage-backed bonds,that are collateralized (like FHLB advances) and the advance-rate yieldcurve appears to be the appropriate reference. An alternative to an advance-rate yield curve would be for the Board torely on the Treasury yield curve. The Board would determine a weighted-averagematurity (after selection of decay rates), and refer to the Treasury yieldcurve to select a point on the curve as the discount rate. This would producea discount rate that can be expressed as the Treasury rate plus (or minus)a given spread. The Board invites comment on how such a spread should becalculated. The Board requests comments on the calculation of interest rate risk ofdeposits, including accounting for core deposit run-off and the discountrate on borrowings.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6720-01-M 004</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert Illustration(s) 2301-2304</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6720-01-C </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix C_Office of Regulatory Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Thrift Bulletin</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">[Handbook: Thrift Activities; Subjects: Interest Rate Risk Management;Section 420; TB 13; January 26, 1989] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Responsibilities of the Board of Directors and Management With Regardto Interest Rate Risk </ITAG><T3>Summary: </T3>Managing interest rate risk is an essential componentin the safe and sound management of a thrift institution. This Bulletinprovides guidance to the boards of directors and managements of insuredinstitutions about their responsibilities in this area. It describes theinternal policies, practices, and procedures that supervisory staff willexpect institutions to utilize in order to comply with the existing regulationson interest rate risk. <T3>For Further Information Contact: </T3>The FHLBank District in whichyou are located or the Industry Anaysis Division of the Office of RegulatoryActivities, Washington, D.C., (202) 331-4511. Thrift Bulletin 13 Under 12 CFR 563.17-6 and 571.3, an insured institution's board of directorsis responsible for ensuring the prudent management of the institution'sexposure to interest rate risk. In addition, andSection; 563.17(a) requiressafe and sound management practices, of which the management of interestrate risk is an essential component. Since the adoption of the currentregulations governing interest rate risk, Federal Home Loan Bank System(FHLBS) staff has refined and enhanced the System's regulatory policiesand procedures with respect to the interest rate risk exposure of insuredinstitutions. This Bulletin reflects that evolution in regulatory philosophyand presents guidance on the responsibilities of boards of directors andmanagement regarding interest rate risk. FHLBS staff will expect insured institutions to adopt formal interest raterisk policy statements, containing the elements described in this Bulletin,by June 30, 1989.\1\<NOTE/> Institutions will be expected to implement those policiesand any attendant changes in management procedures by December 31, 1989,or sooner where Supervisory Agents believe it to be warranted. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ This Bulletin applies to insured institutions and anysubsidiaries which, for purposes of the Thrift Financial Report, are reportedon a consolidated basis. Definition of Interest Rate Risk Interest rate risk (IRR) is defined as the sensitivity of a depositoryinstitution's earnings and net asset value to changes in interest rates.IRR can result from (a) timing differences in the repricing of an institution'sassets, liabilities, and off-balance sheet contracts; (b) the exerciseof embedded options, such as loan pre-payments, interest rate caps, anddeposit withdrawals; and (c) differences in the behavior of lending andfunding rates, sometimes referred to as basis risk. (An example of thelater source of IRR would occur if floating rate assets and liabilities,with otherwise identical repricing characteristics, were based on marketindexes that were imperfectly correlated.)The earnings of most thrift institutions are exposed to IRR because theirdeposit liabilities reprice faster than their mortgage-related assets.As a result, if interest rates rise, the cost of funds increases more rapidlythan the yield on assets, thereby reducing net interest income. From amarket value perspective, changes in market interest rates have a greatereffect on the present value of long-term, fixed-rate instruments than onthat of short-term instruments. If an institution's assets are of longerduration than its liabilities, the net present value of the institution'sportfolio will decline when interest rates rise. Objectives of IRR Management The objective of IRR management is to maintain an institution's earningsand net worth within self-imposed parameters over a range of possible interestrate environments. Institutions will differ in their willingness to assumeIRR, their management capability, and their ability to absorb potentiallosses. As with other aspects of financial management, a trade-off existsbetween risk and return; thus, the objective of IRR management need notbe the complete elimination of an institution's exposure to changes ininterest rates. The board of directors, however, has a fiduciary responsibilityof ensuring that the level of IRR exposure incurred by the institutiondoes not exceed prudent levels. Policies and Procedures for Managing IRR at Insured Institutions Managing IRR must be considered within the larger context of business planning(e.g., the introduction of new products, expansion, the pricing and structuringof products and services [including any associated customer options]).Although the following discussion focuses on the responsibilities of theboard of directors and management that relate specifically to managingIRR, the discussion is not meant to imply that IRR management can be conductedin isolation of other business considerations. Further, although the boardof directors ought properly to be concerned with the exposure of the consolidatedorganization and will undoubtedly want to assess the risk exposure of thatentity, these guidelines pertain to the insured institution only. Responsibilities of the Board of DirectorsAs noted above, andSection;563.17(a) requires insured institutions to havesafe and sound management practices. The management of IRR is an essentialaspect of managing a thrift institution. The board of directors must, therefore,ensure that the institution's policies and procedures for managing IRRare of a level of sophistication that is commensurate with the institution'sactivities and portfolio and that the institution's exposure is limitedto a prudent level. More specifically, andSection;563.17-6 holds the boardaccountable for the IRR exposure of the institution and requires the boardto establish a formal policy for the management of IRR and to review theresults of management's implementation of that policy on at least a quarterlybasis.Board of Directors' Policy StatementThe board's policy statement should delegate responsibility for the managementof IRR and should establish limits on the level of the institution's exposure.Specific authorizations and restrictions should be provided regarding theinstitution's trading activities, its use of derivatives and syntheticinstruments, and its hedging strategies. To facilitate the board's oversightof management in this area, the policy should specify the contents of management'sreport to the board on this subject and state the frequency with whichthe directors will review IRR management (at least quarterly).The FHLBS has promulgated several policy statements addressing instrumentsor strategies that can have a significant effect on an institution's IRRmanagement. These policy statements include:andbullet; Risk Conrolled Arbitrage (Memorandum SP-74, February 16, 1988;reprinted in United States League of Savings Institutions, <T3>Federal Guide, </T3>andpara;11,762);andbullet; Investment Consultants (Memorandum R-70, March 16, 1988);andbullet; Mortgage Derivative Products and Mortgage Swaps (Thrift BulletinTB 12, December 13, 1988).Because of their connection to IRR, the requirements of these issuancesshould be of interest to boards of directors in framing their policieson IRR.Exposure LimitsThe most important element of the board of directors' policy statementis a set of explicit limits on the institution's exposure to IRR. Becausethe ability to control IRR requires a clear understanding of the amountat risk, a board policy in which the IRR limit is expressed only in termsof repricing gaps will no longer be considered sufficient; the board mustbe aware of the sensitivity of the institution's earnings and net assetvalue to interest rate changes.To ensure that the board has a clear understanding of the possible consequencesof the IRR exposure being authorized, the institution's IRR policy shoulddefine the maximum potential reduction in earnings and net worth that theboard is prepared to accept as a result of possible changes in market interestrates. Management should structure the institution's balance sheet andoff-balance sheet items so that projected results (under reasonable, documentedassumptions) comply with the board's limits. Specifically, the policy should establish limits on the sensitivity ofthe institution's net interest income\2\<NOTE/> and market value of portfolio equity\3\<NOTE/> to changes in interest rates. That is, the policy shouldspecify the maximum percentage change the board of directors is preparedto accept in those two measures as a result of a parallel shift in theterm structure of interest rates prevailing at the date of the analysis.These maximum changes should be specified for instantaneous and sustainedchanges in interest rates of andplusmin;100, andplusmin;200, andplusmin;300,and andplusmin;400 basis points and should be measured relative to the levelsof net interest income and portfolio equity under an assumption of no changein interest rates.\4\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\The interest rate sensitivity of net interest income shouldbe evaluated over at least the next four quarters.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\The market value of portfolio equity (hereafter also referredto as ``portfolio equity'') is defined as the net present value of an institution'sexisting assets, liabilities, and off-balance sheet instruments. The appendixto this bulletin discusses the composition and calculation of this measurein more detail.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\These particular interest rate scenarios provide a convenientbasis for analyzing risk exposure; they are not meant to be interest rateforecasts. It has become standard practice in financial analysis to examinethe impact of potential rate changes of these magnitudes on the value offinancial instruments and/or portfolios.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Example </T4>1_<T4>XYZ Savings andamp; Loan Association Interest Rate Risk Exposure Limits</T4><H1>Change in interest rates (in basis points) </H1><H1>Maximum Permissible Change in: </H1><H2>Net interest income (next four quarters) (percent) </H2><H2>Market value of portfolio equity (percent)</H2><ITAG tagnum="25">[1] <D>[2] </D><D>[3]</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">+400 <D>^125 </D><D>^90</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">+300 <D>^75 </D><D>^50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">+200 <D>^50 </D><D>^25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">+100 <D>^20 </D><D>^10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0 <D>0 </D><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">^100 <D>^20 </D><D>^10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">^200 <D>^50 </D><D>^25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">^300 <D>^75 </D><D>^50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">^400 <D>^125 </D><D>^90</D></ITAG></ITAG>Example 1 illustrates a possible set of exposure limits that a board ofdirectors might establish. In the example, the directors of XYZ Savingsand Loan have specified that the institution's exposure be limited so that,for each interest rate change listed in column [1] of the table, the institution'snet interest income would be reduced by no more than the percentage shownin column [2], and its market value of portfolio equity would be reducedby no more than the percentage in column [3]. For example, if the marketvalue of XYZ's portfolio equity were $1,000 under current market interestrates, management would have to limit the institution's IRR exposure sothat an immediate increase in interest rates of 400 basis points (column[1], line 1) would reduce portfolio equity by no more than 90 percent (column[3], line 1), to a level of $100. Similarly, if XYZ's net interest incomewere projected to be $400 under a constant rate environment, then managementwould have to limit the institution's exposure so that a 400 basis pointincrease in interest rates (again, column [1], line 1) would reduce netinterest income by no more than 125 percent (column [2], line 1), to noworse than ^$100 (i.e., $400andmultiply;(^125/100)=^$100).The maximum permissible reduction in net interest income and portfolioequity are for the board of directors to determine. The lower the board'sdesired level of interest rate sensitivity, the closer to zero it shouldset these percentages. Note, for instance, that in column [3] of the example,XYZ's board has established limits that would enable the market value ofthe institution's portfolio to withstand an instantaneous and sustainedinterest rate change of 400 basis points in either direction.\5\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ As an institution's projected net interest income (underconstant interest rates) or portfolio equity approach zero, the board ofdirectors will need to be aware that its limits on IRR exposure, expressedas maximum allowable percentage changes in these two measures, will effectivelybecome more stringent and may require adjustment.<ITAG tagnum="28">Institutions with negative projected net interest income (under constantrates) should calculate their percentage changes by dropping the negativesign of the denominator (i.e., by using the absolute value of the demominator).For example, assume an institution's net interest income is projected tobe ^$100 for the next four quarters under a constant interest rate environment.If the board of directors were unwilling to see net interest income fallbelow ^$150 under a particular interest rate scenario, it would specifythe exposure limit for that scenario as ^50%. That is,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">[^$150^(^$100)]andmultiply;100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">__________=^50%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">    $100</ITAG>The technical details of implementing such a policy_e.g., choosing a discountrate for computing changes in market value, ensuring reasonable assumptionsabout the behavior of customer options, and validating the overall computations_maybe left to management. All assumptions should be documented and the boardshould, as part of its oversight function, periodically assure itself thatthey are reasonable.Finally, note that the example specifies the maximum permissible percentagereductions under both positive and negative changes in interest rates.Although the net interest income and portfolio equity of most thrift institutionswould increase in a declining interest rate environment, it is clearlypossible for the opposite situation to exist (i.e., for an institutionto be ``asset sensitive''). There is, of course, no need for the boardof directors to set the exposure limits symmetrically around a zero percentchange in rates, as in Example 1. It should establish the exposure limitsin whatever configuration best reflects the board's views on what constitutesa prudent level of exposure, based upon the institution's financial conditionand its expertise in managing IRR.Periodic review of IRR management:Periodic reports by management to the board of directors should demonstratecompliance with the exposure limits. Reports by management should, therefore,include an analysis of how net interest income and the market value ofprotfolio equity would be affected by the hypothetical interest rate changesspecified in the board's policy.Example 2 illustrates the type of interest rate sensitivity analysis thatmanagement should prepare in order to demonstrate compliance with its board'sexposure limits. In columns [3] and [5] of the example, XYZ's managementis reporting that neither net interest income nor portifolio equity wouldbe reduced by more than the percentages permitted by the board of directors,shown in columns [2] and [4], under any of the prescribed interest rateenvironments. Finally, the levels of net interest income and portfolioequity used as denominators in calculating columns [3] and [5] should bereported as memo items.Clearly, measurements of the sensitivity of the institution's net interestincome and portfolio equity will be necessary for management to demonstratecompliance with the board of directors' limits on exposure (as in columns[3] and [5] of Example 2). The FHLBS will calculate estimates of thesesensitivity measures using data reported on Section H of the Thrift FinancialReport and will provide those estimates to each insured institution.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2(4,0,4),i1,10,10,10,10,10</C><T4>Example 2_Current Exposure of XYZ Savings </T4>andamp;<T4> Loan Association to Hypothetical Changes In Interest Rates</T4><H1>Change in interest rates (in basis points)</H1><H1>Percentage change in:</H1><H2>Net interest income</H2><H3>Board limit (percent)</H3><H3>Projected change (percent)</H3><H2>MV of portfolio equity</H2><H3>Board limit (percent)</H3><H3>Projected change (percent)</H3><ITAG tagnum="25">[1] <D>[2] </D><D>[3] </D><D>[4] </D><D>[5]</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">+400 <D>^125 </D><D>^105 </D><D>^90 </D><D>^85</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">+300 <D>^75 </D><D>^70 </D><D>^50 </D><D>^40</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">+200 <D>^50 </D><D>^30 </D><D>^25 </D><D>^15</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">+100 <D>^20 </D><D>^10 </D><D>^10 </D><D>^5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0 <D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">^100 <D>^20 </D><D>15 </D><D>^10 </D><D>10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">^200 <D>^50 </D><D>35 </D><D>^25 </D><D>15</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">^300 <D>^75 </D><D>40 </D><D>^50 </D><D>15</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">^400 <D>^125 </D><D>45 </D><D>^90 </D><D>20</D><F>Memo: Net interest income projected under constant interest rates: $400;Market value of portfolio equity under current interest rates: $1,000.</F></ITAG></ITAG>All thrift institutions are strongly encouraged to develop the capabilityof performing those sensitivity measures for themselves, both to improvethe quality of information being supplied to their boards of directorsand to improve management's ability to manage the institution's exposureto interest rate risk. Nonetheless, because these measurement techniquesare not presently in widespread use in the thrift industry, the managementsof most institutions many opt to rely on the FHLBS's interest rate sensitivityestimates to demonstrate compliance with their directors' exposure limits.Institutions with assets in excess of $500 million or investing in highrisk mortgage derivative products will not be permitted to rely solelyon the FHLBS's exposure estimates. Such institutions should have the managementinformation systems necessary to perform the required interest rate sensitivitymeasurements. They will, therefore, be expected to be able to generatereliable net interest income and market value sensitivity measures by December31, 1989.\6\<NOTE/> In addition, Supervisory Agents have the discretion to requireother institutions to develop such a measurement capability. Typically,this will be required of institutions with substantial volumes of options,futures, or interest rate swaps, or that otherwise have a complex asset/liabilityprofile.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ Supervisory Agents may extend this deadline for institutionsthat are making good faith efforts to develop the necessary data processingsystems and technical abilities.Because any system of IRR management will rely on certain assumptions,management should demonstrate to the board, and document, that the assumptionsunderlying its interest rate sensitivity analysis are reasonable. For example,management would need to explain how prepayments would be expected to behaveunder the various interest rate changes and how they would affect the sensitivitymeasures.\7\<NOTE/> If more elaborate sensitivity analysis is used by the institutionthan is prescribed by these guidelines, the assumptions being made in thatanalysis should be discussed with the board and documented.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ Managements using the FHLBS estimate measures of interestrate sensitivity should conduct a similar discussion with their directorsin order to apprise them of the reliability of those estimates.The board of directors should also consider requiring management to reconcileactual operating results and market values with those projected in theprior period's interest rate sensitivity analysis. Analyzing the sourcesof variance between actual and forecast will be beneficial not only inimproving the institution's financial forecasting ability, but will addto the board's understanding of the major factors driving the institution'sexposure to interest rates and the variability of those factors. This exercisewill also high-light, for the board, any de facto changes in the institution'sbusiness plan.Responsibilities of Management Management is responsible for structuring the institution's balance sheetand off-balance sheet transactions in a manner consistent with the board'sIRR policy. Management will accomplish this objective through three activities:andbullet; Developing and implementing an IRR management strategy; andbullet; Establishing and maintaining a system of limits and controls;and andbullet; Establishing and utilizing an IRR measurement system. IRR management strategy: The board and management are responsible for ensuring the safety and soundnessof the institution's IRR management strategy and its implementation. Indeciding upon an IRR strategy, the board and management should take intoaccount the level of expertise needed to implement the strategy and whethersuch expertise is currently available in the institution. A prudent IRRmanagement strategy should be within the scope of existing management expertise.If an institution requires outside assistance to formulate and implementsuch a strategy, it should observe the provisions of R-Memorandum Number70 (Investment Consultants: Guidelines on Use of Such Consultants, andMonitoring and Controlling Their Activities). That is, management mustunderstand fully the reasons for adopting a given strategy and its possibleeffects on the short-term and long-term financial health of the institution.Responsibility for such decision-making cannot be ceded to the consultant.There may be circumstances in which steps taken to manage IRR conflictwith or limit an institution's ability to attain other business goals.In order to ensure that such conflicts are minimized, management's IRRstrategy should be developed in conjunction with the creation of a comprehensivebusiness plan for the institution. Further, an institution's strategy toremedy an excessive IRR exposure should not rely on speculative or problematicplans that might result in excessive credit or liquidity risk. Limits and controls: Management must control the institution's operating activities so thatthe aggregate IRR exposure may be coordinated and brought into compliancewith the board's policy. The diverse investment, lending, funding, andcapital market activities of the institution must be conducted within asystem of reporting and controls that will permit management to monitorand manage the overall IRR exposure of the institution. Furthermore, certain units within the typical institution have the abilityto affect the institution's IRR exposure quite rapidly. Typically theseare units involved in capital markets activities. Because of the significantpotential impact such activities can have on the institution's exposureand the speed with which they can be consummated, management should establishexposure limits on such units and their personnel. A timely means of monitoringcompliance with those exposure limits is essential. The longer the lagbetween the possible establishment of an undesired or unauthorized exposureand management's ability to reverse that exposure, the greater is the possibilityof loss. IRR measurement:An essential element of managing IRR is the ability to measure interestrate exposure accurately. Management has the responsibility to use a methodof measurement that accurately assesses its exposure to IRR. The stateof knowledge about asset/liability management has advanced rapidly in recentyears and the development of measurement techniques, such as duration andsimulation models, has greatly enhanced the ability of depository institutionsto measure and manage their IRR exposures. As previously discussed, most institutions will be permitted to rely onthe exposure estimates calculated by the FHLBS. These estimates will generallybe less accurate than measures generated using detailed internal data andbased upon an institution's own informed assumptions. Moreover, becauseof reporting lags, the FHLB's estimates will not be as current as an institution'sinternally generated exposure measurements would be. It is, therefore,strongly recommended that all thrift institutions develop the capabilityto calculate their own measures of exposure to interest rate risk. The measures and procedures presented in this Bulletin are not intendedto preclude institutions from engaging in other techniques of measuringand managing IRR. On the contrary, the interest rate sensitivity measuresprescribed above should be considered the minimum level of informationneeded by the board of directors in order to oversee the management ofIRR effectively. <ITAG tagnum="81">Regulatory Concerns </ITAG>There are four circumstances that would cause regulatory concern: (a) anonexistent or incomplete IRR policy, (b) unacceptably high limits on IRRexposure, (c) noncompliance with the board of directors' IRR policy, and(d) weaknesses in management reporting systems or internal controls. Nonexistent IRR Policy The first cause for regulatory concern is the absence of a written IRRpolicy or a policy that lacks one or more of the elements discussed inthe section, ``Board of directors' policy statement''. As noted above,existing regulation requires the board of directors to adopt a policy forthe management of IRR. If such a policy is nonexistent or fails to addressrelevant policy issues, the institution may be in violation of andSection;563.17-6, and the situation will be treated in the same manner as otherpossible violations of regulations. Unacceptable Limits on IRR Exposure The board of directors has a fiduciary responsibility to operate the institutionin a safe and sound manner. It should, therefore, establish and ensurecompliance with prudent limits on IRR exposure. Generally, such limitsshould not permit an exposure that has the potential to deplete net worthto a level below the regulatory minimum or to eliminate the market valueof the institution's portfolio equity under plausible changes in interestrates.\8\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ Some troubled institutions have limited scope to reducetheir IRR exposure. Supervisory Agents, therefore, have discretion to modifythe guidelines in this bulletin for institutions operating under ConsentAgreements or Special Agreements. In determining whether such an institution'sexposure is excessive from a regulatory perspective, Supervisory Agentsshould review the available alternatives for reducing the institution'sexposure and the impact those alternatives would have on the institution'sfinancial condition. The Supervisory Agent's decision should be communicatedto the institution's board and documented. Such an institution should,nonetheless, otherwise comply with the guidelines in this bulletin. Inparticular, its board of directors will be expected to maintain exposurelimits (albeit possibly high ones) and its management will be expectedto measure and report the institution's current interest rate exposure.If regulatory staff determines that excessive exposures are permitted bythe board's IRR policy, or if the institution fails to take appropriateaction to reduce such an existing exposure, the board of directors willbe apprised of these findings and be given adequate opportunity to respondto the assessment of the regulatory staff. If, following considerationof the institution's response, the Principal Supervisory Agent believesthat the institution's IRR exposure is inappropriate, and if the institutionfails to take remedial steps, enforcement action will be taken. Noncompliance with Board of Directors' IRR Policy If an institution's IRR exposure is found to exceed the limits establishedby the board of directors, corrective measures (e.g., improved reportingsystems, intensified board oversight) should be taken in order to preventa recurrence of the situation. If the excessive exposure was the resultof intentional decisions by management to exceed the board's limits, appropriatedisciplinary action should be taken by the board of directors.Weaknesses in Reporting or Internal ControlsThe final source of possible concern is an institution with weaknessesin its IRR management practices and procedures (e.g., poor measurementsystems, weak internal controls). While such an institution's exposuremay not be excessive at present, deficiencies in IRR management allow forthe possibility that excessive exposures may develop in the future. Theidentified weaknesses will be discussed with the institution's board andmanagement, and an acceptable plan to correct them will be required.<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix to Thrift Bulletin 13_Calculating the Market Value of PortfolioEquity</ITAG>The market value of portfolio equity (``portfolio equity'') is a key componentof a depository institution's economic value. As is discussed below, portfolioequity is defined as the net present value of assets, liabilities, andoff-balance sheet contracts.The interest rate sensitivity of portfolio equity is an important measureof IRR. Since portfolio equity includes the present value of the futurecash flows resulting from all currently booked instruments, it providesa leading indicator of an institution's future stream of net interest income.This allows management to take a longer-term perpsective on IRR managementwithout having to examine the effects of a particular portfolio structureon net interest income in each individual future period; the change inportfolio equity thereby provides a compact measure of those future effects.The interest rate sensitivity of portfolio equity is also highly relevantfrom a regulatory perspective, since it measures the potential effect ofinterest rate changes on the major component of an institution's economicvalue. Economic value is an important consideration for all thrifts, butit is an especially important consideration with regard to marginally solventinstitutions, since changes in portfolio equity have a direct bearing onthe potential cost of disposing of such institutions, should they fail.Calculating the Market Value of Portfolio Equity The general formula for calculating the market value of portfolio equityis as follows:Market value of portfolio equity=Present value of cash flows from existing assets<T3>minus</T3> the present value of cash flows from existing liabilities<T3>plus</T3> the present value of cash inflows from existing off-balancesheet contracts<T3>minus</T3> the present value of cash outflows from existing off-balancesheet contracts.Computing changes in the market value of portfolio equity will clearlyrequire an institution to make a number of assumptions. Management shouldensure that all assumptions are reasonable and are documented. The followingdiscussion provides some guidance in calculating portfolio equity and inmaking the necessary assumptions.Cash flows to be included in the market value calculation:andbullet; cash and deposits with other financial institutions;andbullet; expected receipts (principal and interest) associated with existingloans, leases, participations, and securities (regardless of whether heldfor investment or trading purposes);andbullet; expected payments of principal and interest associated with existingdeposits and borrowings (including subordinated debt);andbullet; expected payments of dividends on all preferred stock;andbullet; expected cash inflows and outflows associated with existing futures,swaps, options, and firm and optional commitments to originate, purchase,and sell financial instruments; andandbullet; any other well-defined, contractual cash flows resulting fromexisting financial contracts, such as loan servicing agreements.Adjustments to cash flows due to customer options:Future cash flows on the items listed above may be greatly affected bythe existence of customer options, such as loan prepayments, caps, or depositwithdrawals. The institution will need to make assumptions about how customeroptions will be exercised under different interest rates and adjust thescheduled cash flows accordingly.Assets to be included at book value:It is difficult to calculate the present value of many of the assets andliabilities of thrift institutions because of uncertainty about the timingand the amount of their cash flows. To avoid unduly complicating the IRRmeasurement process at this early stage of implementation, it may reasonablybe assumed that the present values of some items will not be affected bychanges in the level of interest rates. This assumption is most easilyincorporated into the analysis by assuming that the present value of suchitems remains at book value (net of any associated valuation allowance),regardless of the interest rate scenario. In calculating the percentagechange in the market value of portfolio equity, therefore, the presentvalue of the following assets should generally be assumed to be equal totheir book value (net of any associated valuation allowance), regardlessof the level of interest rates;andbullet; fixed assets;andbullet; repossessed assets;andbullet; real estate held for development, investment, or resale; andandbullet; assets of which any portion is classified as doubtful or loss.Cash flows to be excluded from the market value calculation:The following types of cash flows should generally be excluded from thecalculation of portfolio equity:andbullet; anticipated loan fees or service charges, other than those thatmay reasonably be expected in connection with existing assets or liabilitiesor in connection with existing commitments;andbullet; anticipated non-interest expenses (e.g., salaries, occupancy expenses,income taxes); andandbullet; future dividends (except preferred dividends) to be paid to orreceived from individuals or corporations (including service corporationsor other unconsolidated affiliates).In addition, certain other balance sheet entries that are appropriate underRegulatory Accounting Principles should be excluded from the calculationof the market value of portfolio equity. These are accounting entries intendedto delay the recognition of income or expense cash flows that actuallyoccurred in the past, such as:andbullet; deferred loan fees, unamortized premiums, or unaccredited discounts;andbullet; fees paid on options;andbullet; deferred gains or losses on futures or options or deferred gainsor losses on the sale of assets; andandbullet; goodwill.Method discounting:A number of alternative discount rate configurations are possible, rangingfrom discounting all cash flows by a single ``average'' discount rate,to configurations in which different discounts rates are used for eachcash flow. The costs and benefits of one method versus another will differfor each institution. The responsibility for choosing a particular discountingmethod resides with the institution. Like other assumptions necessary tothe analysis, the details of the method that is chosen, and the rationalefor choosing it, should be documented. Finally, to assure an unbiased analysis,the method of discounting should be applied by the institution in a consistentmanner over time. Any changes, and the reasons for them, should be welldocumented.<ITAG tagnum="20">By the Federal Home Loan Bank Board</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John F. Ghizzoni,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-15555 Filed 6-30-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6720-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>